Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 61

Military Forces

Subchapter 1

— State Militia Generally

12-61-101. Division and composition.

The militia shall be divided into two (2) parts: the organized, consisting of the active and inactive Army National Guard and Air National Guard; and the unorganized, consisting of all those persons of the militia not in the active or inactive Army National Guard or Air National Guard.

The militia shall consist of all able-bodied male residents of the state between the ages of seventeen (17) and forty-five (45) years who are, or intend to become, citizens of the United States, unless exempt by law, together with all other acceptable volunteers, waiving necessary requirements.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-102, 11-103.

12-61-102. Commander-in-Chief.

The Governor, by virtue of his or her office, shall be Commander-in-Chief of the militia, except the parts thereof as are ordered into the service of the United States.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-104.

12-61-103. Governor's powers and duties generally.

The Governor is authorized to make such rules governing the government, organization, discipline, and training of the militia as he or she may deem expedient.

Such rules shall conform to the provisions of this code and, as nearly as practicable, to those governing the United States Armed Forces.

When promulgated, the rulesshall have the same force and effect as the provisions of this code.

Such rules shall not be repealed, altered, amended, or added to, except with the approval of the Governor.

The rules in force at the time of the passage of this code shall remain in force until new rules are approved and promulgated.

The Governor may, by executive order, designate National Guard commissioned officers or warrant officers or active duty officers or warrant officers serving in armed forces recruiting offices inside or outside the State of Arkansas to administer the oath of enlistment to new members of the militia.

Whenever he or she shall deem it necessary, the Governor may direct the members of the unorganized militia to present themselves for and submit to registration at such time and place and in such manner as may be prescribed by rule.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” throughout (a); and substituted “rule” for “regulations” in (c).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 5, 199; 1983, No. 412, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-105, 11-1101; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 917, 918.

12-61-104. Custom and usage of the United States Armed Forces.

All matters relating to the organization, discipline, and government of the organized militia, not otherwise provided for in this code or in rules issued pursuant thereto, shall be as prescribed by the customs and usages of the appropriate force or forces of the United States.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 200; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1102; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 919.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

12-61-105. Adjutant General — Qualifications — Salary.

There shall be an Adjutant General of the state who shall be appointed by the Governor and shall be a commissioned officer in the Adjutant General's department of the National Guard of this state and shall have rank not higher than lieutenant general.

To be eligible for appointment, he or she shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State of Arkansas, and:

He or she must be an officer in the active militia with not less than seven (7) successive years' service immediately next preceding his or her appointment; or

He or she must have been in service in the active militia of this state as a commissioned officer for a period of fifteen (15) years, eight (8) of which were as a field grade officer or general officer, or both combined; or

He or she must have held the rank of a field grade officer in the active militia and, as such, have been called into federal service and have commanded a unit during such service.

The pay of the Adjutant General and the assistant adjutant general shall be the same as is allowed to officers of like grade, service, and rank by the pay tables of the United States Army or Air Force at the time such pay accrues.

The Adjutant General is permitted to receive payments in addition to regular salary as provided by the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., while serving in the federal position of technician while also serving as Adjutant General. Such additional payments are provided for in Title IV of the Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970, Pub. L. No. 91-648.

U.S. Code. Title IV of the Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970, Pub. L. No. 91-648, is codified as 5 U.S.C. §§ 3371-3376.

He or she shall hold office as provided in the National Defense Act, as amended.

He or she shall superintend the preparation of all returns and reports required by the United States from the state.

He or she shall have the custody of all military records, correspondence, and other military documents.

He or she shall be the medium of military correspondence with the Governor and perform all other duties pertaining to his or her office prescribed by law.

He or she shall keep a register of all the officers of the military forces of the state.

He or she shall keep in his or her office all records and papers required to be kept and filed therein. He or she shall make such reports to the Governor, at such times as the Governor may require, of all the transactions of his or her department, setting forth the number, strength, and condition of the active militia and such other matters as he or she may deem important, including a detailed statement of all the expenditures for military purposes during that fiscal year.

He or she shall, at the expense of the state, when necessary, cause the military law, instruction pamphlets, orders, and the general regulations of the state and the United States to be printed, indexed, and distributed as deemed necessary.

He or she shall cause to be prepared and issued all necessary blank books, blank forms, and notices required to carry into full effect the provisions of this code. All such books and blanks shall be and remain the property of the state.

He or she shall procure and keep in his or her office a seal for the authentication of all certificates and other instruments emanating from his or her office, the device upon which such seal shall consist of a star with five (5) points with the words, “Office of the Adjutant General, State of Arkansas,” around the margin and shall deliver the seal to his or her successor. He or she shall attest all commissions issued to military officers.

He or she shall keep a just and true account of all state expenses necessarily incurred, including pay of officers and enlisted personnel, allowances to officers and organizations, and any other moneys required to be disbursed by him or her and through his or her office, including subsistence of the militia, transportation of the militia and of all military property of the state; and such expenses shall be audited and paid in the same manner as other military accounts are audited and paid.

The Adjutant General may, at his or her discretion, inspect all units of the militia.

For the purpose of effectively carrying out the terms of this code, the Adjutant General shall have the power to prescribe such rules as he or shemay from time to time deem necessary.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (o).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of the Military” for “administrative head of the Military Department” in (a).

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2005, No. 52, § 1, subdivision (b)(2) ended with “after the effective date of this act.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “and with the Department of the Military after July 1, 2019” in (b)(2).

He or she must be an officer in the active service in the Army National Guard or the Air National Guard of this state for three (3) successive years immediately preceding his or her appointment; or

He or she must have been in the active service in the branch or arm for which appointed of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard as a commissioned officer; or

If not in active National Guard service at the time of appointment, he or she must have had prior service of at least six (6) years in the branch or arm of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard of this state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 10; 1977, No. 694, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-110, 11-110.1; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 2.

12-61-106. Adjutant General — Powers and duties.

In addition to being a state staff officer, the Adjutant General shall be the Chief-of-Staff to the Commander-in-Chief and the Secretary of the Department of the Military.

He or she shall perform the duties prescribed for him or her in this code and in the rules issued thereunder and in the statutes of the United States.

He or she shall direct and supervise the functions and duties of the chief-of-staff departments.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 6, 204; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-110, 11-1106; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 920, 921; 2019, No. 910, §
5530.

12-61-107. Employment of personnel.

The Adjutant General shall have such assistance and such clerks, employees, and laborers as may be necessary from time to time who shall be appointed and may be removed by him or her at his or her discretion.

(1)The Adjutant General may designate those positions that require the employee to be a member of the National Guard.

This subsection shall only apply to a person who begins employment with the State Military Department after August 12, 2005, and with the Department of the Military after July 1, 2019.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-112; Acts 2005, No. 52, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5531.

12-61-108. Deputy adjutants general.

(1)The Adjutant General is authorized to appoint, subject to the approval of the Governor, four (4) deputy adjutants general who will hold rank of not higher than one (1) grade below that held by the Adjutant General up to and including the rank of major general.

Two (2) deputy adjutants general will be Army National Guard and two (2) deputy adjutants general will be Air National Guard.

However, the foregoing shall not preclude the appointment of federally recognized lieutenant generals to perform the additional duties of deputy adjutants general.

At the time of the appointment:

The deputy adjutants general must have a thorough knowledge of the organization and missions of the departments and components of the armed forces of the United States.

To be eligible for appointment as a Deputy Adjutant General for Air, the officer must be assigned to the Air National Guard in the rank of colonel, federally recognized.

He or she shall subscribe to the oath of office prescribed for members of the Arkansas Army National Guard and Air National Guard, which oath shall be deposited in the office of the Adjutant General.

He or she shall, during his or her term of office, be entitled to all rights, privileges, and immunities granted officers of like rank in the Arkansas National Guard.

He or she shall aid the Adjutant General by the performance of such duties as may be assigned to him or her.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-114; Acts 1987, No. 360, § 1; 1991, No. 510, § 1; 2007, No. 47, § 3.

12-61-109. Adjutant General — Delegation of authority.

The Adjutant General may designate by order any deputy adjutant general to act as the Adjutant General in the absence of the latter from his or her office or in case of his or her inability to perform the duties of his or her office. In the event of the inability of any deputy adjutant general to perform the duties of the Adjutant General, then the Adjutant General may appoint by order any qualified Army or Air Guard officer in the grade of colonel or above.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-113; Acts 1989, No. 179, § 1; 1991, No. 510, § 2.

12-61-110. Property and finance officer.

After consulting with the Adjutant General, the Governor shall appoint, designate, and detail, subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Army and confirmation by the Senate, an officer of the National Guard as the property and finance officer for the United States.

He or she shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of Arkansas, and shall have served on the active list as a commissioned officer of either the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or the National Guard of this state.

He or she shall receive and account for all funds and property belonging to the United States in possession of the Arkansas National Guard and shall make such disbursements, returns, and reports as may be required by the Secretary of the Army.

Before entering upon the performance of his or her duties, he or she shall be required to give good and sufficient bond to the United States in an amount determined by the Secretary of the Army for the faithful performance of his or her duties and for the safekeeping and proper disposition of the federal property and funds entrusted to him or her.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “After consulting with the Adjutant General, the Governor” for “The Governor, upon recommendation of the Adjutant General” and inserted “and confirmation by the Senate”.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted (C), rearranged and redesignated the remaining text, and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment added (a)(1)(D).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-114; Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 9.

12-61-111. Ordering militia into service.

(1)The Governor shall have power to order into the active service of the state for such a period, to such extent, and in such manner as he or she may deem necessary, all or any part of the organized militia:

In case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, or imminent danger thereof;

To preserve the public health and security and maintain law and order;

For the purpose of working with other state agencies in the planning and training for emergencies or disasters and to respond to emergencies or disasters; or

For the purpose of addressing cybersecurity threats or cybersecurity vulnerabilities, including without limitation to protect:

Critical infrastructure in the state;

An information system owned or operated by the state;

Information that is stored on, processed by, or transiting on an information system owned or operated by the state; or

The state by identifying the source of a cybersecurity threat.

Such power shall include the power to order the organized militia or any part thereof to function under the operational control of the United States Army, United States Navy, or United States Air Force commander in charge of the defense of any area within the state.

(1)Upon the request of either the judge or sheriff of a county or the mayor of a city, whenever it is made to appear to the Governor that there is a breach of the peace, riot, resistance to process of this state, or disaster or imminent danger thereof, the Governor may order into the active service of the state, for such period, to such extent, and in such manner as he or she may deem necessary, all or any part of the organized militia.

The compensation of all officers and enlisted personnel while on duty or assembled pursuant to this subsection and all expenses incurred in connection with such duty or as a result thereof shall be paid in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 6, 7; 1985, No. 670, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-106, 11-107; Acts 2009, No. 232, § 1; 2019, No. 149, § 1.

12-61-112. Powers, duties, and immunities of militia.

Whenever such forces or any part thereof shall be ordered out for service of any kind, they shall have all powers, duties, and immunities of peace officers of the State of Arkansas in addition to all powers, duties, and immunities now otherwise provided by law.

No officer or enlisted personnel of such forces shall be arrested on any warrant except for treason or felony while going to, remaining at, or returning from a place where they are ordered to attend for military duty.

Whenever any part of the militia of the state is on active duty pursuant to the order of the Governor in the enforcement of the law or executing the orders of the Commander-in-Chief, the commanding officer of such troops may order the closing of any place where arms, ammunition, dynamite, or other explosives are sold and restrict or forbid the selling, bartering, lending, or giving away of any such articles so long as any of the troops remain on duty in such place, or in the vicinity where such place may be located, whether any civil officer has forbidden the same or not.

The commanding officer of the organization on duty under this code will cooperate in aid of the civil power, but under the orders of the Commander-in-Chief or Adjutant General and not the civil authorities.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-106, 11-107.

12-61-113. Scope of duties — Service outside the state.

The Governor may order the National Guard or any portion thereof to perform military duty of every description within the state. He or she may authorize participation in small arms and gunnery competitions by any part of the National Guard anywhere outside the state or outside the United States.

Officers and enlisted personnel of the National Guard shall be subject to and governed by the provisions of this act while without this state under the order or authorization of the Governor under this section in like manner and to the same extent as when on duty within this state under orders of the Governor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 15, 16; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-115, 11-116.

12-61-114. Call to duty.

Officers and enlisted personnel may be ordered for duty either by stating the substance of the orders telephonically, personally, by mail, or in such other manner as may be prescribed by the Governor as he or she deems necessary to accomplish the purpose. Upon having given notice, there shall be a presumption that the officer or enlisted person was properly called to duty.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 18; 1985, No. 670, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-118.

12-61-115. Proclamation of emergency.

Whenever any portion of the militia is employed in aid of the civil authority, the Governor, if in his or her judgment the maintenance of law and order or preservation of the public health or security will thereby be promoted, may by proclamation declare the county, city, zone, or sector in which the troops are serving, or any specified portion thereof, to be in a state of insurrection or emergency.

Should the Governor proclaim a state of insurrection or emergency hereunder and in the event the local courts or law enforcement officers are incapable of functioning, such legal functions in furtherance of the enforcement of the civil laws of the state shall be performed by the militia.

This section does not authorize the seizure or confiscation of any firearm or ammunition from any individual who is lawfully carrying or possessing the firearm or ammunition.

Any law enforcement officer or member of the militia who seizes or confiscates a firearm or ammunition from an individual under this section shall return the seized or confiscated firearm or ammunition to the individual unless:

The individual is arrested for a criminal offense; or

The seized firearm or ammunition is needed as evidence in the furtherance of an investigation of a criminal offense.

Subsection (a) of this section left the decision as to whether to issue a proclamation of a state of insurrection or emergency to the discretion of the Governor of Arkansas; however, the lack of such a proclamation did not mean that the National Guard's involvement in counterdrug surveillance was unlawful, particularly since the Governor had certified that the counterdrug plan complied with Arkansas law. United States v. Boyster, 436 F.3d 986 (8th Cir. 2006).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 8, 20; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-108, 11-120; Acts 2007, No. 1578, § 1.

12-61-116. Excuse from duty.

The officer ordering any military duty shall have the power to excuse any officer or enlisted person for absence therefrom upon good and sufficient grounds.

The Governor, or commanding general of the National Guard with the approval of the Governor, may relieve any organization of the militia on active duty from the further performance of such duty and may order any other organization to perform such duty.

However, the provisions of this section shall not curtail the rights of commanding officers to grant leaves of absence and furloughs as provided by rules unless they are specifically modified by orders from superior authority.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 19; 1985, No. 670, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-119; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 922.

12-61-117. Draft of the unorganized militia — Failure to appear — Penalty.

Whenever it shall be necessary in case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, or imminent danger thereof, or to maintain the organized militia or any force thereof at the number required for public safety or prescribed by the laws of the United States, the Governor may call for and accept from the unorganized militia as many volunteers as are required for service in the organized militia or he or she may direct the members of the unorganized militia or such of them as may be necessary to be drafted into the organized militia or any force thereof.

Whenever it shall be necessary in such a case, the Governor may direct the members of the unorganized militia or such of them as may be necessary to be drafted, under such rules as he or she may prescribe, into the active service of the state to serve as directed by him or her.

Any member of the unorganized militia who is ordered to register or to be drafted into the organized militia under the provisions of this code and who fails to appear at the time and place designated in such order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction by a civil court shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not less than one (1) month nor more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-109; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 923.

12-61-118. Resumption of National Guard service.

Upon the termination of any emergency for which the National Guard of Arkansas has been ordered into the military service of the United States, all enlisted personnel, upon being released under honorable conditions from the Army or Air Force of the United States, shall continue to serve in the National Guard of Arkansas until the dates upon which their enlistments prior to their active duty would have expired if uninterrupted. The commissioned officers shall resume their commissions in the National Guard of Arkansas in the respective grades held by them when ordered to active duty or in any higher grade which they may have attained while in service if appointed by the Governor to fill existing vacancies.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 17; 1985, No. 670, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-117.

12-61-119. Credit for active federal service.

For all purposes under this code, members of the National Guard who entered the active military service of the United States in time of war or under a call, order, or draft by the President or who hereafter enter such service under like conditions or who enter and serve on active duty in the military service of the United States in time of peace or war and who thereafter return to the military service of the state shall be entitled to credit for time served as if such service had been rendered to the state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-207.

12-61-120. Credit for war service.

For all purposes under this code, officers and enlisted personnel of the National Guard who entered the active service of the United States in time of war or under a call or draft by the President or who enters such service under like conditions shall be entitled to credit for time so served as if such service had been rendered in the National Guard.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 38; 1985, No. 670, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-406.

12-61-121. Awards, medals, etc.

The Governor is authorized to award in the name of the State of Arkansas any medal, ribbon, or decoration for any exceptional or meritorious service rendered by any member of the organized militia.

These include, but are not limited to, the “Arkansas Commendation Medal”, the “Arkansas Distinguished Service Medal”, and the “Arkansas Star of Honor”.

The Department of the Military is authorized to promulgate necessary rules to establish the criteria under which any medal, ribbon, or decoration may be awarded.

Whenever it shall appear to the satisfaction of the Adjutant General that any service medal duly issued by the State of Arkansas, in accordance with the military rules, to a member of the organized militia, has been lost or stolen, he or she may, in his or her discretion, and upon such terms as he or she may impose upon written application of the person originally entitled to such medal, issue a duplicate thereof.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” in (a)(3).

The Adjutant General may adopt such reasonable and necessary rules as may be necessary to accomplish this purpose.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Amendments. The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

[Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted the language “as may be implemented by the Adjutant General” from the end of subsection (b) without markup.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “National Guard Youth Challenge Program” for “Civilian juvenile student training programs” in the section heading; substituted “a National Guard Youth Challenge Program” for “civilian juvenile student training programs” in (a); in (b), deleted “and the juvenile courts of this state” following “corporations”, and substituted “the program” for “such programs as may be implemented by the Adjutant General”; and deleted (d).

A.C.R.C. Notes. The 1997 act did not amend the section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 201, 202; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1103, 11-1104; Acts 1991, No. 550, § 1; 2007, No. 47, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 924, 925; 2019, No. 910, §
5532.

12-61-122. National Guard associations.

The officers or noncommissioned officers or members of any unit or units of the organized militia may organize themselves into an association or associations.

The association or associations may adopt bylaws not inconsistent with the statutes of the state and alter and amend the bylaws and may take and hold such real and personal property as may be necessary for the purposes of the association.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 203; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1105.

12-61-123. Bureau of War Records.

The Adjutant General may, at his or her discretion and with such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly, establish a Bureau of War Records.

The bureau shall function in close connection with the Arkansas State Archives and shall gather items of military history of the Arkansas Militia for exhibition.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-111; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 96; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 96; 2019, No. 315, § 926.

12-61-124. National Guard Youth Challenge Program.

The Adjutant General may, at his or her discretion and with such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly, or with such funds as may be provided by the United States, develop and implement a National Guard Youth Challenge Program for the purpose of providing training, education, health, welfare, rehabilitative, and other services to juveniles.

The Adjutant General is authorized to enter into agreements, contracts, and memoranda of understanding with other state, federal, and local agencies, other persons, firms, and corporations for the purposes of providing training, education, health, welfare, rehabilitative, and other services to juveniles participating in the program.

The Adjutant General may promulgate and issue such rules and other guidelines as may be necessary and proper to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 375, § 1; 1995, No. 639, §§ 18, 19; 1997, No. 1201, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 927; 2019, No. 910, §
5533.

12-61-125. National Guard Youth Challenge Program — Stipend.

Juvenile participants in the Arkansas National Guard Youth Challenge Program at Camp Joseph T. Robinson receiving services from the Arkansas National Guard are authorized to receive a monetary stipend, not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) per week to defray personal hygiene and other personal necessities, and a monetary stipend not to exceed two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200) upon graduation from the program to defray costs for additional job training or education.

Juvenile participants are authorized to receive uniforms and clothing items as determined by the staff to be appropriate for effective participation in outdoor activities.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 639, § 17; 1997, No. 821, § 21.

12-61-126. National Guard Youth Challenge Program — Transportation.

Transportation to support Arkansas National Guard Youth Challenge Program activities for juvenile participants and staff may be provided by commercial lease or purchase of motor vehicles not to exceed six (6) vehicles.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 639 § 20; 1997, No. 821, § 24.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The 1997 act did not amend the section.

12-61-127. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Civilian Student Training Program stipend, uniforms, and clothing items, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5534, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 639, § 18; 1997, No. 821, § 22.

12-61-128. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Civilian Student Training Program transportation, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5535, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 639, § 19; 1997, No. 821, § 23.

Subchapter 2

— National Guard Generally

Cross References. Regulations governing use of national guard property, §12-63-302.

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 1985, No. 670, § 11: Apr. 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain disciplinary provisions of the state military code need to be strengthened; that this act results in the same and should be given effect prior to the 1985 annual training of the military personnel subject to the state military code; that April 1 is a reasonable date to expect that this act will have been passed by both houses and acted upon by the Governor and that a date certain is desirable for the effective date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after April 1, 1985.”

Acts 2007, No. 47, § 11: Feb. 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided:“It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are many members of the Arkansas National Guard and Reserves that are serving in active duty in Iraq and Afghanistan in the war on terror; that it is critical that Arkansas law be updated and be consistent with federal law and rules; and that this act is necessary to eliminate confusion regarding out-dated and inconsistent provisions in the Military Code of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

12-61-201. Commanding general of the organized militia.

The organized militia shall be commanded by a general officer who shall be federally recognized or qualified for federal recognition in a rank not higher than lieutenant general.

He or she shall be responsible for the military efficiency of the Arkansas organized militia.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-201; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 4.

12-61-202. Army National Guard.

The land force of the organized militia shall be the Army National Guard as contemplated under the laws of the United States and shall comprise the army units which are a part of the Arkansas National Guard on February 12, 1969, and such other army units as may be allocated, accepted, and organized thereafter, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed, or commissioned therein, provided that all persons who are members of the Army National Guard shall be federally recognized as such.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-202.

12-61-203. Air National Guard.

The air force of the organized militia shall be the Air National Guard as contemplated under the laws of the United States and shall comprise the air units which are a part of the Arkansas National Guard on February 12, 1969, and such other air units as may be allocated, accepted, and organized thereafter, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed, or commissioned therein, provided that all persons who are members of the Air National Guard shall be federally recognized as such. The aviation units of the Army National Guard shall not be considered air units within the meaning of this code.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-203.

12-61-204. Inactive National Guard.

The inactive National Guard shall consist of the persons commissioned, appointed, or enlisted therein on February 12, 1969, such officers and enlisted persons as may be thereafter transferred thereto from the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard, and such persons as may be commissioned or enlisted therein under the laws of the United States and the regulations thereunder.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 28; 1985, No. 670, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-208.

12-61-205. Discipline, organization, and training.

The system of discipline and training of the National Guard shall conform generally to that of the United States Armed Forces as it is now or may hereafter be prescribed by the President of the United States and conform to the provisions of the laws of the United States, except as otherwise provided in this code or by the rules issued by the Governor.

The forces of the Army National Guard and Air National Guard shall be organized, equipped, armed, disciplined, governed, administered, and trained as prescribed by the laws of the United States and by this code and the regulations and rules issued thereunder.

Pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the Governor is authorized to organize, reorganize, or disband any unit, headquarters, or staff therein, to increase or decrease the number of commissioned officers, warrant officers and noncommissioned officers of any grade therein, and to increase or decrease the strength of the organized militia. However, no organization of the Army National Guard and Air National Guard, the members of which shall be entitled to and shall have received compensation under the provisions of the National Defense Act of 1916, as amended, shall be disbanded without the consent of the President of the United States, nor without such consent shall the commissioned or enlisted strength of any organization be reduced below the minimum that shall be prescribed therefor by the President of the United States.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a); and inserted “and rules” following “regulations” in (b).

U.S. Code. The National Defense Act of 1916, referred to in this section, is Pub. L. No. 64-85, 39 Stat. 166.For current law, see generally Titles 10, 32, and 37 of the U.S. Code.

ALR.

Construction and Application of 37 U.S.C. § 206, Providing Compensation for Military Reserves and Members of National Guard with Respect to Inactive-Duty Training. 73 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 27.

Members of the National Guard may be ordered by the Governor or under his or her authority to perform special duty, including duty in a judicial proceeding or course of justice conducted pursuant to § 12-64-101 et seq., or as a member of or in any other capacity with any military board or as an investigating officer or as a medical examiner or as a judge advocate in the performance of legal services in any suit, action, or proceeding pertaining to the military.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “and rules” following “regulations” in the first sentence of (a).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 24, 39; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-204, 11-407; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 928.